Illinois, session 104th, HB5438.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Enterprise Zone Act is amended by 5changing Section 5.5 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 655/5.5)  (from Ch. 67 1/2, par. 609.1)7    Sec. 5.5. High Impact Business. 8    (a) In order to respond to unique opportunities to assist 9in the encouragement, development, growth, and expansion of 10the private sector through large-scale large scale investment 11and development projects, the Department is authorized to 12receive and approve applications for the designation of "High 13Impact Businesses" in Illinois, for an initial term of 20 14years with an option for renewal for a term not to exceed 20 15years, subject to the following conditions:16        (1) such applications may be submitted at any time 17    during the year;18        (2) such business is not located, at the time of 19    designation, in an enterprise zone designated pursuant to 20    this Act, except for the following:21            (A) grocery stores, as defined in the Grocery 22        Initiative Act; ,23            (B) and a new battery energy storage solution   HB5438- 2 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1        facility, as defined by subparagraph (I) of paragraph 2        (3) of this subsection (a);3            (C) utility-scale brownfield site photovoltaic 4        projects over 5,000 kilowatts; and5            (D) utility-scale solar projects, as defined in 6        Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power Agency Act;7        (3) the business intends to do, commits to do, or is 8    one or more of the following: 9            (A) the business intends to make a minimum 10        investment of $12,000,000 which will be placed in 11        service in qualified property and intends to create 12        500 full-time equivalent jobs at a designated location 13        in Illinois or intends to make a minimum investment of 14        $30,000,000 which will be placed in service in 15        qualified property and intends to retain 1,500 16        full-time retained jobs at a designated location in 17        Illinois. The terms "placed in service" and "qualified 18        property" have the same meanings as described in 19        subsection (h) of Section 201 of the Illinois Income 20        Tax Act; or21            (B) the business intends to establish a new 22        electric generating facility at a designated location 23        in Illinois. "New electric generating facility", for 24        purposes of this Section, means a newly constructed 25        electric generation plant or a newly constructed 26        generation capacity expansion at an existing electric   HB5438- 3 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1        generation plant, including the transmission lines and 2        associated equipment that transfers electricity from 3        points of supply to points of delivery, and for which 4        such new foundation construction commenced not sooner 5        than July 1, 2001. Such facility shall be designed to 6        provide baseload electric generation and shall operate 7        on a continuous basis throughout the year; and (i) 8        shall have an aggregate rated generating capacity of 9        at least 1,000 megawatts for all new units at one site 10        if it uses natural gas as its primary fuel and 11        foundation construction of the facility is commenced 12        on or before December 31, 2004, or shall have an 13        aggregate rated generating capacity of at least 400 14        megawatts for all new units at one site if it uses coal 15        or gases derived from coal as its primary fuel and 16        shall support the creation of at least 150 new 17        Illinois coal mining jobs, or (ii) shall be funded 18        through a federal Department of Energy grant before 19        December 31, 2010 and shall support the creation of 20        Illinois coal mining jobs, or (iii) shall use coal 21        gasification or integrated gasification-combined cycle 22        units that generate electricity or chemicals, or both, 23        and shall support the creation of Illinois coal mining 24        jobs. The term "placed in service" has the same 25        meaning as described in subsection (h) of Section 201 26        of the Illinois Income Tax Act; or  HB5438- 4 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1            (B-5) the business intends to establish a new 2        gasification facility at a designated location in 3        Illinois. As used in this Section, "new gasification 4        facility" means a newly constructed coal gasification 5        facility that generates chemical feedstocks or 6        transportation fuels derived from coal (which may 7        include, but are not limited to, methane, methanol, 8        and nitrogen fertilizer), that supports the creation 9        or retention of Illinois coal mining jobs, and that 10        qualifies for financial assistance from the Department 11        before December 31, 2010. A new gasification facility 12        does not include a pilot project located within 13        Jefferson County or within a county adjacent to 14        Jefferson County for synthetic natural gas from coal; 15        or16            (C) the business intends to establish production 17        operations at a new coal mine, re-establish production 18        operations at a closed coal mine, or expand production 19        at an existing coal mine at a designated location in 20        Illinois not sooner than July 1, 2001; provided that 21        the production operations result in the creation of 22        150 new Illinois coal mining jobs as described in 23        subdivision (a)(3)(B) of this Section, and further 24        provided that the coal extracted from such mine is 25        utilized as the predominant source for a new electric 26        generating facility. The term "placed in service" has   HB5438- 5 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1        the same meaning as described in subsection (h) of 2        Section 201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act; or3            (D) the business intends to construct new 4        transmission facilities or upgrade existing 5        transmission facilities at designated locations in 6        Illinois, for which construction commenced not sooner 7        than July 1, 2001. For the purposes of this Section, 8        "transmission facilities" means transmission lines 9        with a voltage rating of 115 kilovolts or above, 10        including associated equipment, that transfer 11        electricity from points of supply to points of 12        delivery and that transmit a majority of the 13        electricity generated by a new electric generating 14        facility designated as a High Impact Business in 15        accordance with this Section. The term "placed in 16        service" has the same meaning as described in 17        subsection (h) of Section 201 of the Illinois Income 18        Tax Act; or19            (E) the business intends to establish a new wind 20        power facility at a designated location in Illinois. 21        For purposes of this Section, "new wind power 22        facility" means a newly constructed electric 23        generation facility, a newly constructed expansion of 24        an existing electric generation facility, or the 25        replacement of an existing electric generation 26        facility, including the demolition and removal of an   HB5438- 6 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1        electric generation facility irrespective of whether 2        it will be replaced, placed in service or replaced on 3        or after July 1, 2009, that generates electricity 4        using wind energy devices, and such facility shall be 5        deemed to include any permanent structures associated 6        with the electric generation facility and all 7        associated transmission lines, substations, and other 8        equipment related to the generation of electricity 9        from wind energy devices. For purposes of this 10        Section, "wind energy device" means any device, with a 11        nameplate capacity of at least 0.5 megawatts, that is 12        used in the process of converting kinetic energy from 13        the wind to generate electricity; or 14            (E-5) the business intends to establish a new 15        utility-scale solar facility at a designated location 16        in Illinois. For purposes of this Section, "new 17        utility-scale solar power facility" means a newly 18        constructed electric generation facility, or a newly 19        constructed expansion of an existing electric 20        generation facility, placed in service on or after 21        July 1, 2021, that (i) generates electricity using 22        photovoltaic cells and (ii) has a nameplate capacity 23        that is greater than 5,000 kilowatts, and such 24        facility shall be deemed to include all associated 25        transmission lines, substations, energy storage 26        facilities, and other equipment related to the   HB5438- 7 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1        generation and storage of electricity from 2        photovoltaic cells; or 3            (F) the business commits to (i) make a minimum 4        investment of $500,000,000, which will be placed in 5        service in a qualified property, (ii) create 125 6        full-time equivalent jobs at a designated location in 7        Illinois, (iii) establish a fertilizer plant at a 8        designated location in Illinois that complies with the 9        set-back standards as described in Table 1: Initial 10        Isolation and Protective Action Distances in the 2012 11        Emergency Response Guidebook published by the United 12        States Department of Transportation, (iv) pay a 13        prevailing wage for employees at that location who are 14        engaged in construction activities, and (v) secure an 15        appropriate level of general liability insurance to 16        protect against catastrophic failure of the fertilizer 17        plant or any of its constituent systems; in addition, 18        the business must agree to enter into a construction 19        project labor agreement including provisions 20        establishing wages, benefits, and other compensation 21        for employees performing work under the project labor 22        agreement at that location; for the purposes of this 23        Section, "fertilizer plant" means a newly constructed 24        or upgraded plant utilizing gas used in the production 25        of anhydrous ammonia and downstream nitrogen 26        fertilizer products for resale; for the purposes of   HB5438- 8 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1        this Section, "prevailing wage" means the hourly cash 2        wages plus fringe benefits for training and 3        apprenticeship programs approved by the U.S. 4        Department of Labor, Bureau of Apprenticeship and 5        Training, health and welfare, insurance, vacations and 6        pensions paid generally, in the locality in which the 7        work is being performed, to employees engaged in work 8        of a similar character on public works; this paragraph 9        (F) applies only to businesses that submit an 10        application to the Department within 60 days after 11        July 25, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 12        98-109); or 13            (G) the business intends to establish a new 14        cultured cell material food production facility at a 15        designated location in Illinois. As used in this 16        paragraph (G):17            "Cultured cell material food production facility" 18        means a facility (i) at which cultured animal cell 19        food is developed using animal cell culture 20        technology, (ii) at which production processes occur 21        that include the establishment of cell lines and cell 22        banks, manufacturing controls, and all components and 23        inputs, and (iii) that complies with all existing 24        registrations, inspections, licensing, and approvals 25        from all applicable and participating State and 26        federal food agencies, including the Department of   HB5438- 9 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1        Agriculture, the Department of Public Health, and the 2        United States Food and Drug Administration, to ensure 3        that all food production is safe and lawful under 4        provisions of the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act 5        related to the development, production, and storage of 6        cultured animal cell food.7            "New cultured cell material food production 8        facility" means a newly constructed cultured cell 9        material food production facility that is placed in 10        service on or after June 7, 2023 (the effective date of 11        Public Act 103-9) or a newly constructed expansion of 12        an existing cultured cell material food production 13        facility, in a controlled environment, when the 14        improvements are placed in service on or after June 7, 15        2023 (the effective date of Public Act 103-9); or 16            (H) the business is an existing or planned grocery 17        store, as that term is defined in Section 5 of the 18        Grocery Initiative Act, and receives financial support 19        under that Act within the 10 years before submitting 20        its application under this Act; or 21            (I) the business intends to establish a new 22        battery energy storage solution facility at a 23        designated location in Illinois. As used in this 24        paragraph (I):25            "New battery energy storage solution facility" 26        means a newly constructed battery energy storage   HB5438- 10 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1        facility, a newly constructed expansion of an existing 2        battery energy storage facility, or the replacement of 3        an existing battery energy storage facility that 4        stores electricity using battery devices and other 5        means. "New battery energy storage solution facility" 6        includes any permanent structures associated with the 7        new battery energy storage facility and all associated 8        transmission lines, substations, and other equipment 9        that is related to the storage and transmission of 10        electric power and that has a capacity of not less than 11        20 megawatt and storage capability of not less than 40 12        megawatt hours of energy; or 13            (J) the business intends to construct a new high 14        voltage direct current converter station at a 15        designated location in Illinois. As used in this 16        paragraph, "high voltage direct current converter 17        station" has the same meaning given to that term in 18        Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power Agency Act; or 19            (K) the business intends to construct a new high 20        voltage direct current converter station facility at a 21        designated location in Illinois. As used in this 22        paragraph, "high voltage direct current converter 23        station" has the same meaning given to that term in 24        Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power Agency Act; and 25        (4) no later than 90 days after an application is 26    submitted, the Department shall notify the applicant of   HB5438- 11 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1    the Department's determination of the qualification of the 2    proposed High Impact Business under this Section.3    (b) Businesses designated as High Impact Businesses 4pursuant to subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this Section shall 5qualify for the credits and exemptions described in the 6following Acts: Section 9-222 and Section 9-222.1A of the 7Public Utilities Act, subsection (h) of Section 201 of the 8Illinois Income Tax Act, and Section 1d of the Retailers' 9Occupation Tax Act; provided that these credits and exemptions 10described in these Acts shall not be authorized until the 11minimum investments set forth in subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this 12Section have been placed in service in qualified properties 13and, in the case of the exemptions described in the Public 14Utilities Act and Section 1d of the Retailers' Occupation Tax 15Act, the minimum full-time equivalent jobs or full-time 16retained jobs set forth in subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this 17Section have been created or retained. Businesses designated 18as High Impact Businesses under this Section shall also 19qualify for the exemption described in Section 5l of the 20Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. The credit provided in 21subsection (h) of Section 201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act 22shall be applicable to investments in qualified property as 23set forth in subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this Section.24    (b-5) Businesses designated as High Impact Businesses 25pursuant to subdivisions (a)(3)(B), (a)(3)(B-5), (a)(3)(C), 26(a)(3)(D), (a)(3)(G), (a)(3)(H), and (a)(3)(K) of this Section   HB5438- 12 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1shall qualify for the credits and exemptions described in the 2following Acts: Section 51 of the Retailers' Occupation Tax 3Act, Section 9-222 and Section 9-222.1A of the Public 4Utilities Act, and subsection (h) of Section 201 of the 5Illinois Income Tax Act; however, the credits and exemptions 6authorized under Section 9-222 and Section 9-222.1A of the 7Public Utilities Act, and subsection (h) of Section 201 of the 8Illinois Income Tax Act shall not be authorized until the new 9electric generating facility, the new gasification facility, 10the new transmission facility, the new, expanded, or reopened 11coal mine, the new cultured cell material food production 12facility, or the existing or planned grocery store is 13operational, except that a new electric generating facility 14whose primary fuel source is natural gas is eligible only for 15the exemption under Section 5l of the Retailers' Occupation 16Tax Act.17    (b-6) Businesses designated as High Impact Businesses 18pursuant to subdivision (a)(3)(E), (a)(3)(E-5), (A)(3)(I), or 19(a)(3)(J) of this Section shall qualify for the exemptions 20described in Section 5l of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act; 21any business so designated as a High Impact Business being, 22for purposes of this Section, a "Wind Energy Business". 23    (b-7) Beginning on January 1, 2021, businesses designated 24as High Impact Businesses by the Department shall qualify for 25the High Impact Business construction jobs credit under 26subsection (h-5) of Section 201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act   HB5438- 13 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1if the business meets the criteria set forth in subsection (i) 2of this Section. The total aggregate amount of credits awarded 3under the Blue Collar Jobs Act (Article 20 of Public Act 101-9) 4shall not exceed $20,000,000 in any State fiscal year. 5    (c) High Impact Businesses located in federally designated 6foreign trade zones or sub-zones are also eligible for 7additional credits, exemptions and deductions as described in 8the following Acts: Section 9-221 and Section 9-222.1 of the 9Public Utilities Act; and subsection (g) of Section 201, and 10Section 203 of the Illinois Income Tax Act.11    (d) Except for businesses contemplated under subdivision 12(a)(3)(E), (a)(3)(E-5), (a)(3)(G), (a)(3)(H), (A)(3)(I), 13(a)(3)(J), or (a)(3)(K) of this Section, existing Illinois 14businesses which apply for designation as a High Impact 15Business must provide the Department with the prospective plan 16for which 1,500 full-time retained jobs would be eliminated in 17the event that the business is not designated.18    (e) Except for new businesses contemplated under 19subdivision (a)(3)(E), subdivision (a)(3)(G), subdivision 20(a)(3)(H), or subdivision (a)(3)(J) of this Section, new 21proposed facilities which apply for designation as High Impact 22Business must provide the Department with proof of alternative 23non-Illinois sites which would receive the proposed investment 24and job creation in the event that the business is not 25designated as a High Impact Business.26    (f) Except for businesses contemplated under subdivision   HB5438- 14 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1(a)(3)(E), subdivision (a)(3)(G), subdivision (a)(3)(H), 2subdivision (a)(3)(J), or (a)(3)(K) of this Section, in the 3event that a business is designated a High Impact Business and 4it is later determined after reasonable notice and an 5opportunity for a hearing as provided under the Illinois 6Administrative Procedure Act, that the business would have 7placed in service in qualified property the investments and 8created or retained the requisite number of jobs without the 9benefits of the High Impact Business designation, the 10Department shall be required to immediately revoke the 11designation and notify the Director of the Department of 12Revenue who shall begin proceedings to recover all wrongfully 13exempted State taxes with interest.14    (g) The Department shall revoke a High Impact Business 15designation if the participating business fails to comply with 16the terms and conditions of the designation.17    (h) Prior to designating a business, the Department shall 18provide the members of the General Assembly and Commission on 19Government Forecasting and Accountability with a report 20setting forth the terms and conditions of the designation and 21guarantees that have been received by the Department in 22relation to the proposed business being designated.23    (i) High Impact Business construction jobs credit. 24Beginning on January 1, 2021, a High Impact Business may 25receive a tax credit against the tax imposed under subsections 26(a) and (b) of Section 201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act in an   HB5438- 15 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1amount equal to 50% of the amount of the incremental income tax 2attributable to High Impact Business construction jobs credit 3employees employed in the course of completing a High Impact 4Business construction jobs project. However, the High Impact 5Business construction jobs credit may equal 75% of the amount 6of the incremental income tax attributable to High Impact 7Business construction jobs credit employees if the High Impact 8Business construction jobs credit project is located in an 9underserved area. 10    The Department shall certify to the Department of Revenue: 11(1) the identity of taxpayers that are eligible for the High 12Impact Business construction jobs credit; and (2) the amount 13of High Impact Business construction jobs credits that are 14claimed pursuant to subsection (h-5) of Section 201 of the 15Illinois Income Tax Act in each taxable year. 16    As used in this subsection (i):17    "High Impact Business construction jobs credit" means an 18amount equal to 50% (or 75% if the High Impact Business 19construction project is located in an underserved area) of the 20incremental income tax attributable to High Impact Business 21construction job employees. The total aggregate amount of 22credits awarded under the Blue Collar Jobs Act (Article 20 of 23Public Act 101-9) shall not exceed $20,000,000 in any State 24fiscal year25    "High Impact Business construction job employee" means a 26laborer or worker who is employed by a contractor or   HB5438- 16 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1subcontractor in the actual construction work on the site of a 2High Impact Business construction job project.3    "High Impact Business construction jobs project" means 4building a structure or building or making improvements of any 5kind to real property, undertaken and commissioned by a 6business that was designated as a High Impact Business by the 7Department. The term "High Impact Business construction jobs 8project" does not include the routine operation, routine 9repair, or routine maintenance of existing structures, 10buildings, or real property.11    "Incremental income tax" means the total amount withheld 12during the taxable year from the compensation of High Impact 13Business construction job employees.14    "Underserved area" means a geographic area that meets one 15or more of the following conditions:16        (1) the area has a poverty rate of at least 20% 17    according to the latest American Community Survey; 18        (2) 35% or more of the families with children in the 19    area are living below 130% of the poverty line, according 20    to the latest American Community Survey; 21        (3) at least 20% of the households in the area receive 22    assistance under the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance 23    Program (SNAP); or 24        (4) the area has an average unemployment rate, as 25    determined by the Illinois Department of Employment 26    Security, that is more than 120% of the national   HB5438- 17 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1    unemployment average, as determined by the U.S. Department 2    of Labor, for a period of at least 2 consecutive calendar 3    years preceding the date of the application. 4    (j) (Blank). 5    (j-5) Annually, until construction is completed, a company 6seeking High Impact Business Construction Job credits shall 7submit a report that, at a minimum, describes the projected 8project scope, timeline, and anticipated budget. Once the 9project has commenced, the annual report shall include actual 10data for the prior year as well as projections for each 11additional year through completion of the project. The 12Department shall issue detailed reporting guidelines 13prescribing the requirements of construction-related reports. 14    In order to receive credit for construction expenses, the 15company must provide the Department with evidence that a 16certified third-party executed an Agreed-Upon Procedure (AUP) 17verifying the construction expenses or accept the standard 18construction wage expense estimated by the Department. 19    Upon review of the final project scope, timeline, budget, 20and AUP, the Department shall issue a tax credit certificate 21reflecting a percentage of the total construction job wages 22paid throughout the completion of the project. 23    (k) Upon 7 business days' notice, each taxpayer shall make 24available to each State agency and to federal, State, or local 25law enforcement agencies and prosecutors for inspection and 26copying at a location within this State during reasonable   HB5438- 18 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1hours, the report under subsection (j-5). 2    (l) The changes made to this Section by Public Act 3102-1125, other than the changes in subsection (a), apply to 4High Impact Businesses that submit applications on or after 5February 3, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1125). 6(Source: P.A. 103-9, eff. 6-7-23; 103-561, eff. 1-1-24; 7103-595, eff. 6-26-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-1066, eff. 82-20-25; 104-6, eff. 6-16-25; revised 12-12-25.) 9    Section 10. The Illinois Power Agency Act is amended by 10changing Section 1-10 as follows: 11    (20 ILCS 3855/1-10)12    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-458)13    Sec. 1-10. Definitions. 14    "Agency" means the Illinois Power Agency.15    "Agency loan agreement" means any agreement pursuant to 16which the Illinois Finance Authority agrees to loan the 17proceeds of revenue bonds issued with respect to a project to 18the Agency upon terms providing for loan repayment 19installments at least sufficient to pay when due all principal 20of, interest and premium, if any, on those revenue bonds, and 21providing for maintenance, insurance, and other matters in 22respect of the project.23    "Authority" means the Illinois Finance Authority.24    "Brownfield site photovoltaic project" means photovoltaics   HB5438- 19 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1that are either:2        (1) interconnected to an electric utility as defined 3    in this Section, a municipal utility as defined in this 4    Section, a public utility as defined in Section 3-105 of 5    the Public Utilities Act, or an electric cooperative as 6    defined in Section 3-119 of the Public Utilities Act, 7    where at least 50% of the acreage occupied by the 8    photovoltaics is located on the property regulated by one 9    of the following entities under one of the following 10    programs and located at a site that is regulated by any of 11    the following entities under the following programs:12            (A) the United States Environmental Protection 13        Agency under the federal Comprehensive Environmental 14        Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, as 15        amended;16            (B) the United States Environmental Protection 17        Agency under the Corrective Action Program of the 18        federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, as 19        amended;20            (C) the Illinois Environmental Protection Agency 21        under the Illinois Site Remediation Program; or22            (D) the Illinois Environmental Protection Agency 23        under the Illinois Solid Waste Program; or 24        (2) located at the site of a coal mine that has 25    permanently ceased coal production, permanently halted any 26    re-mining operations, and is no longer accepting any coal   HB5438- 20 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1    combustion residues; has both completed all clean-up and 2    remediation obligations under the federal Surface Mining 3    and Reclamation Act of 1977 and all applicable Illinois 4    rules and any other clean-up, remediation, or ongoing 5    monitoring to safeguard the health and well-being of the 6    people of the State of Illinois, as well as demonstrated 7    compliance with all applicable federal and State 8    environmental rules and regulations, including, but not 9    limited, to 35 Ill. Adm. Code Part 845 and any rules for 10    historic fill of coal combustion residuals, including any 11    rules finalized in Subdocket A of Illinois Pollution 12    Control Board docket R2020-019. 13    "Clean coal facility" means an electric generating 14facility that uses primarily coal as a feedstock and that 15captures and sequesters carbon dioxide emissions at the 16following levels: at least 50% of the total carbon dioxide 17emissions that the facility would otherwise emit if, at the 18time construction commences, the facility is scheduled to 19commence operation before 2016, at least 70% of the total 20carbon dioxide emissions that the facility would otherwise 21emit if, at the time construction commences, the facility is 22scheduled to commence operation during 2016 or 2017, and at 23least 90% of the total carbon dioxide emissions that the 24facility would otherwise emit if, at the time construction 25commences, the facility is scheduled to commence operation 26after 2017. The power block of the clean coal facility shall   HB5438- 21 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1not exceed allowable emission rates for sulfur dioxide, 2nitrogen oxides, carbon monoxide, particulates and mercury for 3a natural gas-fired combined-cycle facility the same size as 4and in the same location as the clean coal facility at the time 5the clean coal facility obtains an approved air permit. All 6coal used by a clean coal facility shall have high volatile 7bituminous rank and greater than 1.7 pounds of sulfur per 8million Btu content, unless the clean coal facility does not 9use gasification technology and was operating as a 10conventional coal-fired electric generating facility on June 111, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 95-1027). 12    "Clean coal SNG brownfield facility" means a facility that 13(1) has commenced construction by July 1, 2015 on an urban 14brownfield site in a municipality with at least 1,000,000 15residents; (2) uses a gasification process to produce 16substitute natural gas; (3) uses coal as at least 50% of the 17total feedstock over the term of any sourcing agreement with a 18utility and the remainder of the feedstock may be either 19petroleum coke or coal, with all such coal having a high 20bituminous rank and greater than 1.7 pounds of sulfur per 21million Btu content unless the facility reasonably determines 22that it is necessary to use additional petroleum coke to 23deliver additional consumer savings, in which case the 24facility shall use coal for at least 35% of the total feedstock 25over the term of any sourcing agreement; and (4) captures and 26sequesters at least 85% of the total carbon dioxide emissions   HB5438- 22 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1that the facility would otherwise emit. 2    "Clean coal SNG facility" means a facility that uses a 3gasification process to produce substitute natural gas, that 4sequesters at least 90% of the total carbon dioxide emissions 5that the facility would otherwise emit, that uses at least 90% 6coal as a feedstock, with all such coal having a high 7bituminous rank and greater than 1.7 pounds of sulfur per 8million Btu content, and that has a valid and effective permit 9to construct emission sources and air pollution control 10equipment and approval with respect to the federal regulations 11for Prevention of Significant Deterioration of Air Quality 12(PSD) for the plant pursuant to the federal Clean Air Act; 13provided, however, a clean coal SNG brownfield facility shall 14not be a clean coal SNG facility. 15    "Clean energy" means energy generation that is 90% or 16greater free of carbon dioxide emissions. 17    "Commission" means the Illinois Commerce Commission.18    "Community renewable generation project" means an electric 19generating facility that: 20        (1) is powered by wind, solar thermal energy, 21    photovoltaic cells or panels, biodiesel, crops and 22    untreated and unadulterated organic waste biomass, and 23    hydropower that does not involve new construction of dams; 24        (2) is interconnected at the distribution system level 25    of an electric utility as defined in this Section, a 26    municipal utility as defined in this Section that owns or   HB5438- 23 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1    operates electric distribution facilities, a public 2    utility as defined in Section 3-105 of the Public 3    Utilities Act, or an electric cooperative, as defined in 4    Section 3-119 of the Public Utilities Act;5        (3) credits the value of electricity generated by the 6    facility to the subscribers of the facility; and7        (4) is limited in nameplate capacity to less than or 8    equal to 5,000 kilowatts. 9    "Costs incurred in connection with the development and 10construction of a facility" means:11        (1) the cost of acquisition of all real property, 12    fixtures, and improvements in connection therewith and 13    equipment, personal property, and other property, rights, 14    and easements acquired that are deemed necessary for the 15    operation and maintenance of the facility;16        (2) financing costs with respect to bonds, notes, and 17    other evidences of indebtedness of the Agency;18        (3) all origination, commitment, utilization, 19    facility, placement, underwriting, syndication, credit 20    enhancement, and rating agency fees;21        (4) engineering, design, procurement, consulting, 22    legal, accounting, title insurance, survey, appraisal, 23    escrow, trustee, collateral agency, interest rate hedging, 24    interest rate swap, capitalized interest, contingency, as 25    required by lenders, and other financing costs, and other 26    expenses for professional services; and  HB5438- 24 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1        (5) the costs of plans, specifications, site study and 2    investigation, installation, surveys, other Agency costs 3    and estimates of costs, and other expenses necessary or 4    incidental to determining the feasibility of any project, 5    together with such other expenses as may be necessary or 6    incidental to the financing, insuring, acquisition, and 7    construction of a specific project and starting up, 8    commissioning, and placing that project in operation. 9    "Delivery services" has the same definition as found in 10Section 16-102 of the Public Utilities Act. 11    "Delivery year" means the consecutive 12-month period 12beginning June 1 of a given year and ending May 31 of the 13following year. 14    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 15Opportunity.16    "Director" means the Director of the Illinois Power 17Agency.18    "Demand-response" means measures that decrease peak 19electricity demand or shift demand from peak to off-peak 20periods.21    "Distributed renewable energy generation device" means a 22device that is:23        (1) powered by wind, solar thermal energy, 24    photovoltaic cells or panels, biodiesel, crops and 25    untreated and unadulterated organic waste biomass, tree 26    waste, and hydropower that does not involve new   HB5438- 25 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1    construction of dams, waste heat to power systems, or 2    qualified combined heat and power systems; 3        (2) interconnected at the distribution system level of 4    either an electric utility as defined in this Section, a 5    municipal utility as defined in this Section that owns or 6    operates electric distribution facilities, or a rural 7    electric cooperative as defined in Section 3-119 of the 8    Public Utilities Act; 9        (3) located on the customer side of the customer's 10    electric meter and is primarily used to offset that 11    customer's electricity load; and12        (4) (blank). 13    "Energy efficiency" means measures that reduce the amount 14of electricity or natural gas consumed in order to achieve a 15given end use. "Energy efficiency" includes voltage 16optimization measures that optimize the voltage at points on 17the electric distribution voltage system and thereby reduce 18electricity consumption by electric customers' end use 19devices. "Energy efficiency" also includes measures that 20reduce the total Btus of electricity, natural gas, and other 21fuels needed to meet the end use or uses. 22    "Electric utility" has the same definition as found in 23Section 16-102 of the Public Utilities Act.24    "Equity investment eligible community" or "eligible 25community" are synonymous and mean the geographic areas 26throughout Illinois which would most benefit from equitable   HB5438- 26 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1investments by the State designed to combat discrimination. 2Specifically, the eligible communities shall be defined as the 3following areas:4        (1) R3 Areas as established pursuant to Section 10-40 5    of the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act, where residents 6    have historically been excluded from economic 7    opportunities, including opportunities in the energy 8    sector; and9        (2) environmental justice communities, as defined by 10    the Illinois Power Agency pursuant to the Illinois Power 11    Agency Act, where residents have historically been subject 12    to disproportionate burdens of pollution, including 13    pollution from the energy sector.14    "Equity eligible persons" or "eligible persons" means 15persons who would most benefit from equitable investments by 16the State designed to combat discrimination, specifically:17        (1) persons who graduate from or are current or former 18    participants in the Clean Jobs Workforce Network Program, 19    the Clean Energy Contractor Incubator Program, the 20    Illinois Climate Works Preapprenticeship Program, 21    Returning Residents Clean Jobs Training Program, or the 22    Clean Energy Primes Contractor Accelerator Program, and 23    the solar training pipeline and multi-cultural jobs 24    program created in paragraphs (a)(1) and (a)(3) of Section 25    16-208.12 of the Public Utilities Act;26        (2) persons who are graduates of or currently enrolled   HB5438- 27 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1    in the foster care system;2        (3) persons who were formerly incarcerated;3        (4) persons whose primary residence is in an equity 4    investment eligible community.5    "Equity eligible contractor" means a business that is 6majority-owned by eligible persons, or a nonprofit or 7cooperative that is majority-governed by eligible persons, or 8is a natural person that is an eligible person offering 9personal services as an independent contractor. 10    "Facility" means an electric generating unit or a 11co-generating unit that produces electricity along with 12related equipment necessary to connect the facility to an 13electric transmission or distribution system.14    "General contractor" means the entity or organization with 15main responsibility for the building of a construction project 16and who is the party signing the prime construction contract 17for the project. 18    "Governmental aggregator" means one or more units of local 19government that individually or collectively procure 20electricity to serve residential retail electrical loads 21located within its or their jurisdiction.22    "High voltage direct current converter station" means the 23collection of equipment that converts direct current energy 24from a high voltage direct current transmission line into 25alternating current using Voltage Source Conversion technology 26and that is interconnected with transmission or distribution   HB5438- 28 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1assets located in Illinois.2    "High voltage direct current renewable energy credit" 3means a renewable energy credit associated with a renewable 4energy resource where the renewable energy resource has 5entered into a contract to transmit the energy associated with 6such renewable energy credit over high voltage direct current 7transmission facilities. 8    "High voltage direct current transmission facilities" 9means the collection of installed equipment that converts 10alternating current energy in one location to direct current 11and transmits that direct current energy to a high voltage 12direct current converter station using Voltage Source 13Conversion technology. "High voltage direct current 14transmission facilities" includes the high voltage direct 15current converter station itself and associated high voltage 16direct current transmission lines. Notwithstanding the 17preceding, after September 15, 2021 (the effective date of 18Public Act 102-662), an otherwise qualifying collection of 19equipment does not qualify as high voltage direct current 20transmission facilities unless its developer entered into a 21project labor agreement, is capable of transmitting 22electricity at 525kv with an Illinois converter station 23located and interconnected in the region of the PJM 24Interconnection, LLC, and the system does not operate as a 25public utility, as that term is defined in Section 3-105 of the 26Public Utilities Act.  HB5438- 29 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1    "Hydropower" means any method of electricity generation or 2storage that results from the flow of water, including 3impoundment facilities, diversion facilities, and pumped 4storage facilities. 5    "Index price" means the real-time energy settlement price 6at the applicable Illinois trading hub, such as PJM-NIHUB or 7MISO-IL, for a given settlement period.8    "Indexed renewable energy credit" means a tradable credit 9that represents the environmental attributes of one megawatt 10hour of energy produced from a renewable energy resource, the 11price of which shall be calculated by subtracting the strike 12price offered by a new utility-scale wind project or a new 13utility-scale photovoltaic project from the index price in a 14given settlement period. 15    "Indexed renewable energy credit counterparty" has the 16same meaning as "public utility" as defined in Section 3-105 17of the Public Utilities Act.18    "Local government" means a unit of local government as 19defined in Section 1 of Article VII of the Illinois 20Constitution.21    "Modernized" or "retooled" means the construction, repair, 22maintenance, or significant expansion of turbines and existing 23hydropower dams. 24    "Municipality" means a city, village, or incorporated 25town.26    "Municipal utility" means a public utility owned and   HB5438- 30 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1operated by any subdivision or municipal corporation of this 2State. 3    "Nameplate capacity" means the aggregate inverter 4nameplate capacity in kilowatts AC. 5    "Person" means any natural person, firm, partnership, 6corporation, either domestic or foreign, company, association, 7limited liability company, joint stock company, or association 8and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee, or personal 9representative thereof.10    "Project" means the planning, bidding, and construction of 11a facility.12    "Project labor agreement" means a pre-hire collective 13bargaining agreement that covers all terms and conditions of 14employment on a specific construction project and must include 15the following:16        (1) provisions establishing the minimum hourly wage 17    for each class of labor organization employee;18        (2) provisions establishing the benefits and other 19    compensation for each class of labor organization 20    employee;21        (3) provisions establishing that no strike or disputes 22    will be engaged in by the labor organization employees;23        (4) provisions establishing that no lockout or 24    disputes will be engaged in by the general contractor 25    building the project; and26        (5) provisions for minorities and women, as defined   HB5438- 31 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1    under the Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and 2    Persons with Disabilities Act, setting forth goals for 3    apprenticeship hours to be performed by minorities and 4    women and setting forth goals for total hours to be 5    performed by underrepresented minorities and women.6    A labor organization and the general contractor building 7the project shall have the authority to include other terms 8and conditions as they deem necessary. 9    "Public utility" has the same definition as found in 10Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act.11    "Qualified combined heat and power systems" means systems 12that, either simultaneously or sequentially, produce 13electricity and useful thermal energy from a single fuel 14source. Such systems are eligible for "renewable energy 15credits" in an amount equal to its total energy output where a 16renewable fuel is consumed or in an amount equal to the net 17reduction in nonrenewable fuel consumed on a total energy 18output basis. 19    "Real property" means any interest in land together with 20all structures, fixtures, and improvements thereon, including 21lands under water and riparian rights, any easements, 22covenants, licenses, leases, rights-of-way, uses, and other 23interests, together with any liens, judgments, mortgages, or 24other claims or security interests related to real property.25    "Renewable energy credit" means a tradable credit that 26represents the environmental attributes of one megawatt hour   HB5438- 32 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1of energy produced from a renewable energy resource.2    "Renewable energy resources" includes energy and its 3associated renewable energy credit or renewable energy credits 4from wind, solar thermal energy, photovoltaic cells and 5panels, biodiesel, anaerobic digestion, crops and untreated 6and unadulterated organic waste biomass, and hydropower that 7does not involve new construction of dams, waste heat to power 8systems, or qualified combined heat and power systems. For 9purposes of this Act, landfill gas produced in the State is 10considered a renewable energy resource. "Renewable energy 11resources" does not include the incineration or burning of 12tires, garbage, general household, institutional, and 13commercial waste, industrial lunchroom or office waste, 14landscape waste, railroad crossties, utility poles, or 15construction or demolition debris, other than untreated and 16unadulterated waste wood. "Renewable energy resources" also 17includes high voltage direct current renewable energy credits 18and the associated energy converted to alternating current by 19a high voltage direct current converter station to the extent 20that: (1) the generator of such renewable energy resource 21contracted with a third party to transmit the energy over the 22high voltage direct current transmission facilities, and (2) 23the third-party contracting for delivery of renewable energy 24resources over the high voltage direct current transmission 25facilities have ownership rights over the unretired associated 26high voltage direct current renewable energy credit.   HB5438- 33 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1    "Retail customer" has the same definition as found in 2Section 16-102 of the Public Utilities Act. 3    "Revenue bond" means any bond, note, or other evidence of 4indebtedness issued by the Authority, the principal and 5interest of which is payable solely from revenues or income 6derived from any project or activity of the Agency.7    "Sequester" means permanent storage of carbon dioxide by 8injecting it into a saline aquifer, a depleted gas reservoir, 9or an oil reservoir, directly or through an enhanced oil 10recovery process that may involve intermediate storage, 11regardless of whether these activities are conducted by a 12clean coal facility, a clean coal SNG facility, a clean coal 13SNG brownfield facility, or a party with which a clean coal 14facility, clean coal SNG facility, or clean coal SNG 15brownfield facility has contracted for such purposes. 16    "Service area" has the same definition as found in Section 1716-102 of the Public Utilities Act. 18    "Settlement period" means the period of time utilized by 19MISO and PJM and their successor organizations as the basis 20for settlement calculations in the real-time energy market. 21    "Sourcing agreement" means (i) in the case of an electric 22utility, an agreement between the owner of a clean coal 23facility and such electric utility, which agreement shall have 24terms and conditions meeting the requirements of paragraph (3) 25of subsection (d) of Section 1-75, (ii) in the case of an 26alternative retail electric supplier, an agreement between the   HB5438- 34 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1owner of a clean coal facility and such alternative retail 2electric supplier, which agreement shall have terms and 3conditions meeting the requirements of Section 16-115(d)(5) of 4the Public Utilities Act, and (iii) in case of a gas utility, 5an agreement between the owner of a clean coal SNG brownfield 6facility and the gas utility, which agreement shall have the 7terms and conditions meeting the requirements of subsection 8(h-1) of Section 9-220 of the Public Utilities Act. 9    "Strike price" means a contract price for energy and 10renewable energy credits from a new utility-scale wind project 11or a new utility-scale photovoltaic project. 12    "Subscriber" means a person who (i) takes delivery service 13from an electric utility, and (ii) has a subscription of no 14less than 200 watts to a community renewable generation 15project that is located in the electric utility's service 16area. No subscriber's subscriptions may total more than 40% of 17the nameplate capacity of an individual community renewable 18generation project. Entities that are affiliated by virtue of 19a common parent shall not represent multiple subscriptions 20that total more than 40% of the nameplate capacity of an 21individual community renewable generation project.22    "Subscription" means an interest in a community renewable 23generation project expressed in kilowatts, which is sized 24primarily to offset part or all of the subscriber's 25electricity usage. 26    "Substitute natural gas" or "SNG" means a gas manufactured   HB5438- 35 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1by gasification of hydrocarbon feedstock, which is 2substantially interchangeable in use and distribution with 3conventional natural gas. 4    "Total resource cost test" or "TRC test" means a standard 5that is met if, for an investment in energy efficiency or 6demand-response measures, the benefit-cost ratio is greater 7than one. The benefit-cost ratio is the ratio of the net 8present value of the total benefits of the program to the net 9present value of the total costs as calculated over the 10lifetime of the measures. A total resource cost test compares 11the sum of avoided electric utility costs, representing the 12benefits that accrue to the system and the participant in the 13delivery of those efficiency measures and including avoided 14costs associated with reduced use of natural gas or other 15fuels, avoided costs associated with reduced water 16consumption, and avoided costs associated with reduced 17operation and maintenance costs, as well as other quantifiable 18societal benefits, to the sum of all incremental costs of 19end-use measures that are implemented due to the program 20(including both utility and participant contributions), plus 21costs to administer, deliver, and evaluate each demand-side 22program, to quantify the net savings obtained by substituting 23the demand-side program for supply resources. In calculating 24avoided costs of power and energy that an electric utility 25would otherwise have had to acquire, reasonable estimates 26shall be included of financial costs likely to be imposed by   HB5438- 36 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1future regulations and legislation on emissions of greenhouse 2gases. In discounting future societal costs and benefits for 3the purpose of calculating net present values, a societal 4discount rate based on actual, long-term Treasury bond yields 5should be used. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, the 6TRC test shall not include or take into account a calculation 7of market price suppression effects or demand reduction 8induced price effects. 9    "Utility-scale solar project" means an electric generating 10facility that:11        (1) generates electricity using photovoltaic cells; 12    and13        (2) has a nameplate capacity that is greater than 14    5,000 kilowatts. 15    "Utility-scale wind project" means an electric generating 16facility that:17        (1) generates electricity using wind; and18        (2) has a nameplate capacity that is greater than 19    5,000 kilowatts. 20    "Waste Heat to Power Systems" means systems that capture 21and generate electricity from energy that would otherwise be 22lost to the atmosphere without the use of additional fuel. 23    "Zero emission credit" means a tradable credit that 24represents the environmental attributes of one megawatt hour 25of energy produced from a zero emission facility.26    "Zero emission facility" means a facility that: (1) is   HB5438- 37 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1fueled by nuclear power; and (2) is interconnected with PJM 2Interconnection, LLC or the Midcontinent Independent System 3Operator, Inc., or their successors.4(Source: P.A. 102-662, eff. 9-15-21; 103-154, eff. 6-28-23; 5103-380, eff. 1-1-24.) 6    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-458)7    Sec. 1-10. Definitions. 8    "Agency" means the Illinois Power Agency.9    "Agency loan agreement" means any agreement pursuant to 10which the Illinois Finance Authority agrees to loan the 11proceeds of revenue bonds issued with respect to a project to 12the Agency upon terms providing for loan repayment 13installments at least sufficient to pay when due all principal 14of, interest and premium, if any, on those revenue bonds, and 15providing for maintenance, insurance, and other matters in 16respect of the project.17    "Authority" means the Illinois Finance Authority.18    "Brownfield site photovoltaic project" means photovoltaics 19that are either:20        (1) interconnected to an electric utility as defined 21    in this Section, a municipal utility as defined in this 22    Section, a public utility as defined in Section 3-105 of 23    the Public Utilities Act, or an electric cooperative as 24    defined in Section 3-119 of the Public Utilities Act, 25    where at least 50% of the acreage occupied by the   HB5438- 38 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1    photovoltaics is located on the property regulated by one 2    of the following entities under one of the following 3    programs and located at a site that is regulated by any of 4    the following entities under the following programs:5            (A) the United States Environmental Protection 6        Agency under the federal Comprehensive Environmental 7        Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, as 8        amended;9            (B) the United States Environmental Protection 10        Agency under the Corrective Action Program of the 11        federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, as 12        amended;13            (C) the Illinois Environmental Protection Agency 14        under the Illinois Site Remediation Program; or15            (D) the Illinois Environmental Protection Agency 16        under the Illinois Solid Waste Program; or 17        (2) located at the site of a coal mine that has 18    permanently ceased coal production, permanently halted any 19    re-mining operations, and is no longer accepting any coal 20    combustion residues; has both completed all clean-up and 21    remediation obligations under the federal Surface Mining 22    and Reclamation Act of 1977 and all applicable Illinois 23    rules and any other clean-up, remediation, or ongoing 24    monitoring to safeguard the health and well-being of the 25    people of the State of Illinois, as well as demonstrated 26    compliance with all applicable federal and State   HB5438- 39 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1    environmental rules and regulations, including, but not 2    limited, to 35 Ill. Adm. Code Part 845 and any rules for 3    historic fill of coal combustion residuals, including any 4    rules finalized in Subdocket A of Illinois Pollution 5    Control Board docket R2020-019. 6    "Clean coal facility" means an electric generating 7facility that uses primarily coal as a feedstock and that 8captures and sequesters carbon dioxide emissions at the 9following levels: at least 50% of the total carbon dioxide 10emissions that the facility would otherwise emit if, at the 11time construction commences, the facility is scheduled to 12commence operation before 2016, at least 70% of the total 13carbon dioxide emissions that the facility would otherwise 14emit if, at the time construction commences, the facility is 15scheduled to commence operation during 2016 or 2017, and at 16least 90% of the total carbon dioxide emissions that the 17facility would otherwise emit if, at the time construction 18commences, the facility is scheduled to commence operation 19after 2017. The power block of the clean coal facility shall 20not exceed allowable emission rates for sulfur dioxide, 21nitrogen oxides, carbon monoxide, particulates and mercury for 22a natural gas-fired combined-cycle facility the same size as 23and in the same location as the clean coal facility at the time 24the clean coal facility obtains an approved air permit. All 25coal used by a clean coal facility shall have high volatile 26bituminous rank and greater than 1.7 pounds of sulfur per   HB5438- 40 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1million Btu content, unless the clean coal facility does not 2use gasification technology and was operating as a 3conventional coal-fired electric generating facility on June 41, 2009 (the effective date of Public Act 95-1027). 5    "Clean coal SNG brownfield facility" means a facility that 6(1) has commenced construction by July 1, 2015 on an urban 7brownfield site in a municipality with at least 1,000,000 8residents; (2) uses a gasification process to produce 9substitute natural gas; (3) uses coal as at least 50% of the 10total feedstock over the term of any sourcing agreement with a 11utility and the remainder of the feedstock may be either 12petroleum coke or coal, with all such coal having a high 13bituminous rank and greater than 1.7 pounds of sulfur per 14million Btu content unless the facility reasonably determines 15that it is necessary to use additional petroleum coke to 16deliver additional consumer savings, in which case the 17facility shall use coal for at least 35% of the total feedstock 18over the term of any sourcing agreement; and (4) captures and 19sequesters at least 85% of the total carbon dioxide emissions 20that the facility would otherwise emit. 21    "Clean coal SNG facility" means a facility that uses a 22gasification process to produce substitute natural gas, that 23sequesters at least 90% of the total carbon dioxide emissions 24that the facility would otherwise emit, that uses at least 90% 25coal as a feedstock, with all such coal having a high 26bituminous rank and greater than 1.7 pounds of sulfur per   HB5438- 41 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1million Btu content, and that has a valid and effective permit 2to construct emission sources and air pollution control 3equipment and approval with respect to the federal regulations 4for Prevention of Significant Deterioration of Air Quality 5(PSD) for the plant pursuant to the federal Clean Air Act; 6provided, however, a clean coal SNG brownfield facility shall 7not be a clean coal SNG facility. 8    "Clean energy" means energy generation that is 90% or 9greater free of carbon dioxide emissions. 10    "Commission" means the Illinois Commerce Commission.11    "Community renewable generation project" means an electric 12generating facility that: 13        (1) is powered by wind, solar thermal energy, 14    photovoltaic cells or panels, biodiesel, crops and 15    untreated and unadulterated organic waste biomass, and 16    hydropower that does not involve new construction of dams; 17        (2) is interconnected at the distribution system level 18    of an electric utility as defined in this Section, a 19    municipal utility as defined in this Section that owns or 20    operates electric distribution facilities, a public 21    utility as defined in Section 3-105 of the Public 22    Utilities Act, or an electric cooperative, as defined in 23    Section 3-119 of the Public Utilities Act;24        (3) credits the value of electricity generated by the 25    facility to the subscribers of the facility; and26        (4) is limited in nameplate capacity to less than or   HB5438- 42 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1    equal to 10,000 kilowatts.2    "Costs incurred in connection with the development and 3construction of a facility" means:4        (1) the cost of acquisition of all real property, 5    fixtures, and improvements in connection therewith and 6    equipment, personal property, and other property, rights, 7    and easements acquired that are deemed necessary for the 8    operation and maintenance of the facility;9        (2) financing costs with respect to bonds, notes, and 10    other evidences of indebtedness of the Agency;11        (3) all origination, commitment, utilization, 12    facility, placement, underwriting, syndication, credit 13    enhancement, and rating agency fees;14        (4) engineering, design, procurement, consulting, 15    legal, accounting, title insurance, survey, appraisal, 16    escrow, trustee, collateral agency, interest rate hedging, 17    interest rate swap, capitalized interest, contingency, as 18    required by lenders, and other financing costs, and other 19    expenses for professional services; and20        (5) the costs of plans, specifications, site study and 21    investigation, installation, surveys, other Agency costs 22    and estimates of costs, and other expenses necessary or 23    incidental to determining the feasibility of any project, 24    together with such other expenses as may be necessary or 25    incidental to the financing, insuring, acquisition, and 26    construction of a specific project and starting up,   HB5438- 43 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1    commissioning, and placing that project in operation. 2    "Delivery services" has the same definition as found in 3Section 16-102 of the Public Utilities Act. 4    "Delivery year" means the consecutive 12-month period 5beginning June 1 of a given year and ending May 31 of the 6following year. 7    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 8Opportunity.9    "Director" means the Director of the Illinois Power 10Agency.11    "Demand response" means measures that decrease peak 12electricity demand or shift demand from peak to off-peak 13periods.14    "Distributed renewable energy generation device" means a 15device that is:16        (1) powered by wind, solar thermal energy, 17    photovoltaic cells or panels, biodiesel, crops and 18    untreated and unadulterated organic waste biomass, tree 19    waste, and hydropower that does not involve new 20    construction of dams, waste heat to power systems, or 21    qualified combined heat and power systems; 22        (2) interconnected at the distribution system level of 23    either an electric utility as defined in this Section, a 24    municipal utility as defined in this Section that owns or 25    operates electric distribution facilities, or a rural 26    electric cooperative as defined in Section 3-119 of the   HB5438- 44 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1    Public Utilities Act; 2        (3) located on the customer side of the customer's 3    electric meter and is primarily used to offset that 4    customer's electricity load; and5        (4) (blank). 6    "Energy efficiency" means measures that reduce the amount 7of electricity or natural gas consumed in order to achieve a 8given end use. "Energy efficiency" includes voltage 9optimization measures that optimize the voltage at points on 10the electric distribution voltage system and thereby reduce 11electricity consumption by electric customers' end use 12devices. "Energy efficiency" also includes measures that 13reduce the total Btus of electricity, natural gas, and other 14fuels needed to meet the end use or uses. 15    "Energy storage system" has the meaning given to that term 16in Section 16-135 of the Public Utilities Act. "Energy storage 17system" does not include technologies that require combustion.18    "Energy storage resources" means the operational output or 19capabilities of energy storage systems. "Energy storage 20resources" includes, but is not limited to, energy, capacity, 21and energy storage credits. 22    "Electric utility" has the same definition as found in 23Section 16-102 of the Public Utilities Act.24    "Equity investment eligible community" or "eligible 25community" are synonymous and mean the geographic areas 26throughout Illinois which would most benefit from equitable   HB5438- 45 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1investments by the State designed to combat discrimination. 2Specifically, the eligible communities shall be defined as the 3following areas:4        (1) R3 Areas as established pursuant to Section 10-40 5    of the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act, where residents 6    have historically been excluded from economic 7    opportunities, including opportunities in the energy 8    sector; and9        (2) environmental justice communities, as defined by 10    the Illinois Power Agency pursuant to the Illinois Power 11    Agency Act, where residents have historically been subject 12    to disproportionate burdens of pollution, including 13    pollution from the energy sector.14    "Equity eligible persons" or "eligible persons" means 15persons who would most benefit from equitable investments by 16the State designed to combat discrimination, specifically:17        (1) persons who graduate from or are current or former 18    participants in the Clean Jobs Workforce Network Program, 19    the Clean Energy Contractor Incubator Program, the 20    Illinois Climate Works Preapprenticeship Program, 21    Returning Residents Clean Jobs Training Program, or the 22    Clean Energy Primes Contractor Accelerator Program, and 23    the solar training pipeline and multi-cultural jobs 24    program created in paragraphs (1) and (3) of subsection 25    (a) of Section 16-108.12 of the Public Utilities Act;26        (2) persons who are graduates of or currently enrolled   HB5438- 46 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1    in the foster care system;2        (3) persons who were formerly incarcerated;3        (4) persons whose primary residence is in an equity 4    investment eligible community.5    "Equity eligible contractor" means a business that is 6majority-owned by eligible persons, or a nonprofit or 7cooperative that is majority-governed by eligible persons, or 8is a natural person that is an eligible person offering 9personal services as an independent contractor. 10    "Facility" means an electric generating unit or a 11co-generating unit that produces electricity along with 12related equipment necessary to connect the facility to an 13electric transmission or distribution system.14    "General contractor" means the entity or organization with 15main responsibility for the building of a construction project 16and who is the party signing the prime construction contract 17for the project. 18    "Governmental aggregator" means one or more units of local 19government that individually or collectively procure 20electricity to serve residential retail electrical loads 21located within its or their jurisdiction.22    "High voltage direct current converter station" means the 23collection of equipment that converts direct current energy 24from a high voltage direct current transmission line into 25alternating current using Voltage Source Conversion technology 26and that is interconnected with transmission or distribution   HB5438- 47 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1assets located in Illinois.2    "High voltage direct current renewable energy credit" 3means a renewable energy credit associated with a renewable 4energy resource where the renewable energy resource has 5entered into a contract to transmit the energy associated with 6such renewable energy credit over high voltage direct current 7transmission facilities. 8    "High voltage direct current transmission facilities" 9means the collection of installed equipment that converts 10alternating current energy in one location to direct current 11and transmits that direct current energy to a high voltage 12direct current converter station using Voltage Source 13Conversion technology. "High voltage direct current 14transmission facilities" includes the high voltage direct 15current converter station itself and associated high voltage 16direct current transmission lines. Notwithstanding the 17preceding, after September 15, 2021 (the effective date of 18Public Act 102-662), an otherwise qualifying collection of 19equipment does not qualify as high voltage direct current 20transmission facilities unless (1) its developer entered into 21a project labor agreement, is capable of transmitting 22electricity at 525kv with an Illinois converter station 23located and interconnected in the region of the PJM 24Interconnection, LLC, and the system does not operate as a 25public utility, as that term is defined in Section 3-105 of the 26Public Utilities Act, serving more than 100,000 customers as   HB5438- 48 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1of January 1, 2021; or (2) its developer has entered into a 2project labor agreement prior to construction, the project is 3capable of transmitting electricity at 525 kilovolts or above, 4and the project has a converter station that is located in this 5State or in a state adjacent to this State and is 6interconnected to PJM Interconnection, LLC, the Midcontinent 7Independent System Operator, Inc., or their successor.8    "Hydropower" means any method of electricity generation or 9storage that results from the flow of water, including 10impoundment facilities, diversion facilities, and pumped 11storage facilities. 12    "Index price" means the real-time energy settlement price 13at the applicable Illinois trading hub, such as PJM-NIHUB or 14MISO-IL, for a given settlement period.15    "Indexed renewable energy credit" means a tradable credit 16that represents the environmental attributes of one megawatt 17hour of energy produced from a renewable energy resource, the 18price of which shall be calculated by subtracting the strike 19price offered by a new utility-scale wind project or a new 20utility-scale photovoltaic project from the index price in a 21given settlement period. 22    "Indexed renewable energy credit counterparty" has the 23same meaning as "public utility" as defined in Section 3-105 24of the Public Utilities Act.25    "Local government" means a unit of local government as 26defined in Section 1 of Article VII of the Illinois   HB5438- 49 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1Constitution.2    "Modernized" or "retooled" means the construction, repair, 3maintenance, or significant expansion of turbines and existing 4hydropower dams. 5    "Municipality" means a city, village, or incorporated 6town.7    "Municipal utility" means a public utility owned and 8operated by any subdivision or municipal corporation of this 9State. 10    "Nameplate capacity" means the aggregate inverter 11nameplate capacity in kilowatts AC. 12    "Person" means any natural person, firm, partnership, 13corporation, either domestic or foreign, company, association, 14limited liability company, joint stock company, or association 15and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee, or personal 16representative thereof.17    "Project" means the planning, bidding, and construction of 18a facility.19    "Project labor agreement" means a pre-hire collective 20bargaining agreement that covers all terms and conditions of 21employment on a specific construction project and must include 22the following:23        (1) provisions establishing the minimum hourly wage 24    for each class of labor organization employee;25        (2) provisions establishing the benefits and other 26    compensation for each class of labor organization   HB5438- 50 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1    employee;2        (3) provisions establishing that no strike or disputes 3    will be engaged in by the labor organization employees;4        (4) provisions establishing that no lockout or 5    disputes will be engaged in by the general contractor 6    building the project; and7        (5) provisions for minorities and women, as defined 8    under the Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and 9    Persons with Disabilities Act, setting forth goals for 10    apprenticeship hours to be performed by minorities and 11    women and setting forth goals for total hours to be 12    performed by underrepresented minorities and women.13    A labor organization and the general contractor building 14the project shall have the authority to include other terms 15and conditions as they deem necessary. 16    "Public utility" has the same definition as found in 17Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act.18    "Qualified combined heat and power systems" means systems 19that, either simultaneously or sequentially, produce 20electricity and useful thermal energy from a single fuel 21source. Such systems are eligible for "renewable energy 22credits" in an amount equal to its total energy output where a 23renewable fuel is consumed or in an amount equal to the net 24reduction in nonrenewable fuel consumed on a total energy 25output basis. 26    "Real property" means any interest in land together with   HB5438- 51 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1all structures, fixtures, and improvements thereon, including 2lands under water and riparian rights, any easements, 3covenants, licenses, leases, rights-of-way, uses, and other 4interests, together with any liens, judgments, mortgages, or 5other claims or security interests related to real property.6    "Renewable energy credit" means a tradable credit that 7represents the environmental attributes of one megawatt hour 8of energy produced from a renewable energy resource.9    "Renewable energy resources" includes energy and its 10associated renewable energy credit or renewable energy credits 11from wind, solar thermal energy, photovoltaic cells and 12panels, biodiesel, anaerobic digestion, crops and untreated 13and unadulterated organic waste biomass, and hydropower that 14does not involve new construction of dams, waste heat to power 15systems, qualified combined heat and power systems, or 16geothermal heating and cooling systems that qualify for the 17Geothermal Homes and Businesses Program. For purposes of this 18Act, landfill gas produced in the State is considered a 19renewable energy resource. "Renewable energy resources" does 20not include the incineration or burning of tires, garbage, 21general household, institutional, and commercial waste, 22industrial lunchroom or office waste, landscape waste, 23railroad crossties, utility poles, or construction or 24demolition debris, other than untreated and unadulterated 25waste wood. "Renewable energy resources" also includes high 26voltage direct current renewable energy credits and the   HB5438- 52 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1associated energy converted to alternating current by a high 2voltage direct current converter station to the extent that: 3(1) the generator of such renewable energy resource contracted 4with a third party to transmit the energy over the high voltage 5direct current transmission facilities, and (2) the 6third-party contracting for delivery of renewable energy 7resources over the high voltage direct current transmission 8facilities have ownership rights over the unretired associated 9high voltage direct current renewable energy credit. 10    "Retail customer" has the same definition as found in 11Section 16-102 of the Public Utilities Act. 12    "Revenue bond" means any bond, note, or other evidence of 13indebtedness issued by the Authority, the principal and 14interest of which is payable solely from revenues or income 15derived from any project or activity of the Agency.16    "Sequester" means permanent storage of carbon dioxide by 17injecting it into a saline aquifer, a depleted gas reservoir, 18or an oil reservoir, directly or through an enhanced oil 19recovery process that may involve intermediate storage, 20regardless of whether these activities are conducted by a 21clean coal facility, a clean coal SNG facility, a clean coal 22SNG brownfield facility, or a party with which a clean coal 23facility, clean coal SNG facility, or clean coal SNG 24brownfield facility has contracted for such purposes. 25    "Service area" has the same definition as found in Section 2616-102 of the Public Utilities Act.   HB5438- 53 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1    "Settlement period" means the period of time utilized by 2MISO and PJM and their successor organizations as the basis 3for settlement calculations in the real-time energy market. 4    "Sourcing agreement" means (i) in the case of an electric 5utility, an agreement between the owner of a clean coal 6facility and such electric utility, which agreement shall have 7terms and conditions meeting the requirements of paragraph (3) 8of subsection (d) of Section 1-75, (ii) in the case of an 9alternative retail electric supplier, an agreement between the 10owner of a clean coal facility and such alternative retail 11electric supplier, which agreement shall have terms and 12conditions meeting the requirements of Section 16-115(d)(5) of 13the Public Utilities Act, and (iii) in case of a gas utility, 14an agreement between the owner of a clean coal SNG brownfield 15facility and the gas utility, which agreement shall have the 16terms and conditions meeting the requirements of subsection 17(h-1) of Section 9-220 of the Public Utilities Act. 18    "Strike price" means a contract price for energy and 19renewable energy credits from a new utility-scale wind project 20or a new utility-scale photovoltaic project. 21    "Subscriber" means a person who (i) takes delivery service 22from an electric utility, and (ii) has a subscription of no 23less than 200 watts to a community renewable generation 24project that is located in the electric utility's service 25area. No subscriber's subscriptions may total more than 40% of 26the nameplate capacity of an individual community renewable   HB5438- 54 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1generation project. Entities that are affiliated by virtue of 2a common parent shall not represent multiple subscriptions 3that total more than 40% of the nameplate capacity of an 4individual community renewable generation project.5    "Subscription" means an interest in a community renewable 6generation project expressed in kilowatts, which is sized 7primarily to offset part or all of the subscriber's 8electricity usage. 9    "Substitute natural gas" or "SNG" means a gas manufactured 10by gasification of hydrocarbon feedstock, which is 11substantially interchangeable in use and distribution with 12conventional natural gas. 13    "Total resource cost test" or "TRC test" means a standard 14that is met if, for an investment in energy efficiency or 15demand-response measures, the benefit-cost ratio is greater 16than one. The benefit-cost ratio is the ratio of the net 17present value of the total benefits of the program to the net 18present value of the total costs as calculated over the 19lifetime of the measures. A total resource cost test compares 20the sum of avoided electric utility costs, representing the 21benefits that accrue to the system and the participant in the 22delivery of those efficiency measures and including avoided 23costs associated with reduced use of natural gas or other 24fuels, avoided costs associated with reduced water 25consumption, avoided costs associated with reduced operation 26and maintenance costs, and avoided societal costs associated   HB5438- 55 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1with reductions in greenhouse gas emissions, as well as other 2quantifiable societal benefits, to the sum of all incremental 3costs of end-use measures that are implemented due to the 4program (including both utility and participant 5contributions), plus costs to administer, deliver, and 6evaluate each demand-side program, to quantify the net savings 7obtained by substituting the demand-side program for supply 8resources. The societal costs associated with greenhouse gas 9emissions shall be $200 per short ton, expressed in 2025 10dollars or the most recently approved estimate developed by 11the federal government using a real discount rate consistent 12with long-term Treasury bond yields, whichever is greater. 13Changes in greenhouse gas emissions due to changes in 14electricity consumption shall be estimated using long-run 15marginal emissions rates developed by the National Renewable 16Energy Laboratory's Cambium model or other Illinois-specific 17modeling of comparable analytical rigor. In discounting future 18costs and benefits for the purpose of calculating net present 19values, a societal discount rate based on actual, long-term 20Treasury bond yields should be used. Notwithstanding anything 21to the contrary, the TRC test shall not include or take into 22account a calculation of market price suppression effects or 23demand reduction induced price effects. 24    "Utility-scale solar project" means an electric generating 25facility that:26        (1) generates electricity using photovoltaic cells;   HB5438- 56 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1    and2        (2) has a nameplate capacity that is greater than 3    5,000 kilowatts alternating current (AC). 4    "Utility-scale wind project" means an electric generating 5facility that:6        (1) generates electricity using wind; and7        (2) has a nameplate capacity that is greater than 8    5,000 kilowatts. 9    "Waste Heat to Power Systems" means systems that capture 10and generate electricity from energy that would otherwise be 11lost to the atmosphere without the use of additional fuel. 12    "Zero emission credit" means a tradable credit that 13represents the environmental attributes of one megawatt hour 14of energy produced from a zero emission facility.15    "Zero emission facility" means a facility that: (1) is 16fueled by nuclear power; and (2) is interconnected with PJM 17Interconnection, LLC or the Midcontinent Independent System 18Operator, Inc., or their successors.19(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-28-23; 103-380, eff. 1-1-24; 20104-458, eff. 6-1-26.) 21    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 22changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 23that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 24represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 25not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes   HB5438- 57 -LRB104 20732 AAS 34235 b1made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 2Public Act.